Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2213.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 25, chapter 3, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 25-332, to read: START_STATUTE25-332. Online estimator; content; review; disclaimers; privacy A. The administrative office of the courts shall design, maintain and post on the official website of the superior court in each county a free estimator that calculates financial outcomes that may result as part of a decree of dissolution of marriage that is entered pursuant to this article. B. The estimator created pursuant to subsection A of this section must: 1. State the assumptions, limitations and METHODOLOGY for each estimation that the estimator provides and display ranges of possible outcomes and not exact predictions. 2. Provide links or references to plain language summaries and the controlling laws and statutes in this state. 3. Be made available in english and spanish. 4. Meet all prevailing online accessibility standards. 5. Be used for informational purposes only. 6. Not constitute legal advice. 7. not be considered a pleading, filing, order or evidence that may be used in a legal proceeding. 8. Not be admissible in any legal proceeding, except to show that educational materials were consulted. 9. Not create a right or a presumption of a right to the user of the estimator. C. The estimator created pursuant to subsection A of this section must display informational, illustrative and nonbinding possible outcomes of a dissolution of marriage, based on user-provided information, in plain language that include all of the following: 1. Property and debt characterization and division of property and debt scenarios that are consistent with this state's laws. 2. A possible range of awards of spousal maintenance, including eligibility factors and the discretionary nature of spousal maintenance awards. 3. The possible Estate planning effects after the entry of a decree of dissolution of marriage, including information that informs users that by operation of law certain beneficiary designations and fiduciary appointments may be automatically revoked on the entry of a decree of dissolution of marriage, and must direct the user to seek legal advice. D. The estimator does not create a legal record. The administrative office of the courts may collect anonymous, aggregated usage statistics for quality improvement purposes.  The estimator may not retain personally identifiable information that is entered by users. E. The administrative office of the courts shall review the estimator annually and update the estimator as necessary to reflect changes in state laws that affect property division or spousal maintenance. F. Reliance by a user on the estimator does not establish a private right of action against this state, the judiciary or officers or employees of the judiciary. G. The supreme court may issue rules or administrative orders to implement this section. END_STATUTE